West Virginia, session 2026, SB287.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. Authorization for Department of REvenue to promulgate legislative rules. §64-7-1. Alcohol Beverage Control Administration. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 22, 2025, authorized under the authority of §60-7-10 of this code, modified by the Alcohol Beverage Control Administration to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 11, 2025, relating to the Alcohol Beverage Control Administration (private clubs, 175 CSR 02), is authorized.